Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 7
VOTING MACHINES

31-10-701. Use of voting machines.

Voting machines may be used in any municipal election if the governing body, by resolution, authorizes their use. The adoption and use of voting machines for municipal elections shall be in accordance with the provisions for the adoption and use of voting machines for general and primary elections insofar as such provisions are applicable to municipal elections.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1053, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-701 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For use of voting machines in general and primary elections, see part 4 of article 7 of title 1.

31-10-702. Judges to inspect machines.

The judges of election of each precinct using voting machines shall meet at the polling place therein at least three-quarters of an hour before the time set for the opening of the polls at each election. Before the polls are open for an election, each judge shall carefully examine each machine used in the precinct and see that no vote has been cast and that every counter, except the protective counter, registers zero.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1054, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-702 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-703. Sample ballots, ballot labels, and cards of instruction.

Sample ballots shall be printed and in the possession of the clerk ten days before the election and shall be subject to public inspection. The sample ballots shall be arranged in the form of a diagram showing the front of the voting machine as it will appear after the official ballot labels are arranged thereon for voting on election day. Such sample ballots may be either in full or reduced size. The clerk shall provide at least two sample ballots for each election precinct, to be delivered to the judges of election and posted in the polling place on election day.

The clerk shall also prepare and place on each voting machine to be used in election precincts under the clerk's supervision a set of official ballot labels arranged in the manner prescribed for the official election ballot to be used on voting machines. When there is more than one person to be elected to an office, there shall be provided two, and only two, spaces for write-in purposes for each different office. No cross mark (X) shall be required opposite the name of a write-in candidate. Candidate names shall be arranged by lot as prescribed by the municipal clerk under the designation of the office. The clerk shall deliver the required number of voting machines, equipped with the official ballot, to each election precinct no later than the day prior to the day of election.

Cards of instruction for the guidance of voters in casting their ballots on voting machines shall also be supplied by the clerk as provided in section 31-10-906.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1054, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(2) amended, p. 1709, § 8, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-703 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-704. Instructions to vote.

In case any voter after entering the voting machine asks for further instructions concerning the manner of voting, a judge shall give such instruction to him; but no judge or other election officer or person assisting such voter shall enter the voting machine, except as provided in section 31-10-608, or in any manner request, suggest, or seek to persuade or induce any such voter to vote for any particular ticket, or for any particular candidate, or for or against any particular amendment, question, or proposition. After receiving such instruction, such voter shall vote as in the case of an unassisted voter.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1054, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-704 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-705. Length of time to vote.

No voter shall remain within the voting machine booth longer than three minutes. If he refuses to leave after a lapse of three minutes, he shall be removed by the judges, but the judges in their discretion may permit a voter to remain longer than three minutes.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1054, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-705 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-706. Judge to watch voting machines.

The judges shall designate at least one of their number to be stationed beside the entrance to the voting machine during the entire period of the election to see that it is properly closed after a voter has entered to vote. At such intervals as he deems proper or necessary, the judge shall examine the face of the machine to ascertain whether it has been defaced or injured, to detect the wrongdoer, and to repair any injury.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1054, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-706 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-707. Clerk to supply seals for voting machines.

The clerk shall supply each election precinct with a seal for each voting machine to be used in the precinct for the purpose of sealing the machine after the polls are closed and with an envelope for the return of the keys to the machine along with the election returns.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1054, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-707 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-708. Close of polls and count of votes.

As soon as the polls are closed, the judges of election shall immediately lock and seal each voting machine against further voting, and it shall so remain for a period of thirty days unless otherwise ordered by the court. Immediately after each machine is locked and sealed, the judges of election shall open the counting compartments thereof and proceed to count the votes thereon. After the total vote for each candidate and upon each question or proposition has been ascertained, the judges of election shall make out a certificate of votes cast, in numerical figures only, and return the same to the clerk as provided in section 31-10-614.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1055, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-708 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-709. Election laws apply - separate absentee ballots permitted.

All of the provisions of this article not inconsistent with the provisions of sections 31-10-701 to 31-10-708 shall apply to all elections held in precincts where voting machines are used. Nothing in sections 31-10-701 to 31-10-708 shall prohibit the use of a separate paper ballot by absentee voters or for charter amendments where such is required.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1055, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-709 as it existed prior to 1975.